North Carolina, session 2025, HB84.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 143-460(25a) is recodified as G.S. 143-460(25b).
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 143-460, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, is
further amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
*H84-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(25a) The term "neonicotinoid pesticide" means any pesticide containing a chemical
belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals, including, but not limited
to, the following:
a. Imidacloprid.
b. Nithiazine.
c. Acetamiprid.
d. Clothianidin.
e. Dinotefuran.
f. Thiacloprid.
g. Thiamethoxam.
h. Any other chemical designated by the Board as belonging to the
neonicotinoid class of chemicals.
The term does not include pet care products used to mitigate fleas, mites, ticks,
heartworms, or other animals harmful to the health of a domesticated animal,
personal care products used to mitigate lice or bedbugs, or any product
regulated under the North Carolina Structural Pest Control Act (Article 4C of
Chapter 106 of the General Statutes)."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 143-443(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(7) Any neonicotinoid pesticide to members of the public at retail, unless the
seller is authorized to sell a restricted use pesticide under this Article and
regulations adopted under the authority of this Article."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 143-443(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(8) For any person to use a neonicotinoid pesticide, unless the person is any of the
following:
a. A pesticide applicator licensed under Part 4 of this Article, or a person
working under the direct supervision of a pesticide applicator licensed
under Part 4 of this Article.
b. A farmer, or person working under the direct supervision of a farmer,
who uses the pesticide for agricultural purposes as defined in
G.S. 106-581.1, including crop production and production of
livestock, poultry, equine, or noncrop agricultural fields.
c. A veterinarian using the pesticide in the practice of veterinary
medicine."
SECTION 3. The Pesticide Board, with the assistance and input of the Pesticide
Advisory Committee, shall monitor the final pollinator risk assessments undertaken by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency (US EPA) as part of the Registration Reviews for the
neonicotinoid pesticides imidacloprid, clothianidin, thiamethoxam, acetamiprid, and dinotefuran
and report on any legislative or regulatory changes necessary to protect pollinators within the
State, taking into account findings and any recommendations of the US EPA risk assessment.
The Board shall forward its report and recommendations for statutory and regulatory changes to
the Commissioner and the Environmental Review Commission within six months of the US
EPA's completion of the final pollinator risk assessments for neonicotinoid pesticides.
SECTION 4. The Pesticide Board shall study whether the State should have the
authority to regulate the use and sale of seeds treated with systemic insecticides, including
whether the State should require that untreated seeds and seeds treated at lower insecticide
application rates be available in the market. In conducting this study, the Board shall consider
the efficacy of seed treatment rates, scouting techniques, pest pressures, economic thresholds,
planting technology differences, and any other criteria the Board deems appropriate. The Board
shall submit the results of the study, including any legislative recommendations, to the
Environmental Review Commission no later than November 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 84-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective October 1, 2025. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 84-First Edition Page 3